North Carolina statutes. Chapter 1F. North Carolina Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.
NORTH CAROLINA COMMENT

Session Law 2011-247 addressed two fundamental categories of interstate discovery involving the North Carolina state courts: (1) parties to an action pending in a foreign jurisdiction, as defined in

G.S. 1F-2

, seeking discovery from a non-party person as defined in

G.S. 1F-2

, residing in North Carolina; (2) parties to an action pending in North Carolina state court seeking discovery from a non-party person residing in a foreign jurisdiction.

G.S. 1F-1

through 1F-7, enacted by Section 1 of Session Law 2011-247, address the first category and are based upon the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act as drafted by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws (NCCUSL).
The remaining sections of Session Law 2011-247 addressed the second category, corresponding amendments to rules of procedure, and were drafted by a joint committee within the Litigation Section of the North Carolina Bar Association.
The drafting committee chose to include North Carolina specific commentary where appropriate for this Chapter.
The committee believes the remainder of Session Laws 2011-247 was self-explanatory and did not require further comment to the rules of procedure.

§ 1F-1.
Short title.

This Chapter may be cited as the “North Carolina Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.”

History.

2011-247, s. 1.

§ 1F-2.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Foreign jurisdiction. — A state other than North Carolina.

Foreign subpoena. — A subpoena issued under authority of a court of record of a foreign jurisdiction.

Person. — An individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government, or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

State. — A state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

Subpoena. — A document, however denominated, issued under authority of a court of record requiring a person to:

Attend and give testimony at a deposition, either oral or upon written questions;

Produce and permit inspection and copying of designated books, documents, records, electronically stored information, or tangible things in the possession, custody, or control of the person; or

Permit inspection of premises under the control of the person.

History.

2011-247, s. 1.

§ 1F-3.
Issuance of subpoena.

To request issuance of a subpoena under this section, a party must submit a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in the county in which discovery is sought to be conducted in this State. A request for the issuance of a subpoena under this act does not constitute an appearance in the courts of this State.

When a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of court in this State, the clerk, in accordance with that court’s procedure, shall promptly open an appropriate court file, assign a file number, collect the applicable filing fee pursuant to G.S. 7A-305(a)(2), and issue a subpoena for service upon the person to which the foreign subpoena is directed.

A subpoena under subsection (b) of this section must:

Incorporate the terms used in the foreign subpoena; and

Contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of all counsel of record in the proceeding to which the subpoena relates and of any party not represented by counsel.

History.

2011-247, s. 1.

§ 1F-4.
Service of subpoena.

A subpoena issued by a clerk of court in North Carolina under

G.S. 1F-3

must be served in compliance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 45(b) of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

2011-247, s. 1.

§ 1F-5.
Deposition; production; inspection.

Rules 26, 28, 30, 31, 34, and 45 of

G.S. 1A-1

, the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure, apply to subpoenas issued under

G.S. 1F-3

.

History.

2011-247, s. 1.

§ 1F-6.
Application to court.

An application to the court for a protective order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena issued by a clerk of court under

G.S. 1F-3

must comply with the rules or statutes of this State and be submitted to the court in the county in which discovery is to be conducted. Where a dispute exists between the parties to the action, the party opposing the discovery shall apply for appropriate relief to the court in which the action is pending and not to the court in the state in which the discovery is sought.

History.

2011-247, s. 1.

§ 1F-7.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this Chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that have enacted the Uniform Interstate Depositions and Discovery Act.

History.

2011-247, s. 1.